Utah statutes.
58-64-502.   Unprofessional conduct.

"Unprofessional conduct" includes:

(1)  using any deception detection instrument that does not meet criteria and standards established by rule by the division in collaboration with the board; and

(2)  using any deception detection instrument that does not make a permanent recording as required under Section 58-64-601.

